District of Columbia statutes.
13-333

Service on incompetent persons.

When a person non compos mentis is a party defendant in an action, process shall be served upon him personally, if within the District, and upon his committee, if there is one within the District.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 513, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Condemnation of insanitary buildings, appointment of guardian ad litem in proceedings, see § 6-909.
1981 Ed., § 13-333.
1973 Ed., § 13-333.